North Dakota, session 69, HB1226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-31-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-31-15. Wearing of masks during commission of criminal offense prohibited.
1. An individual may not wear a mask, hood, or other device that covers, hides, or conceals any
portion of that individual's face:
a. With the intent to intimidate, threaten, abuse, or harass any other individual;
b. For the purpose of evading or escaping discovery, recognition, or identification during the
commission of a criminal offense; or
c. For the purpose of concealment, flight, or escape when the individual has been charged
with, arrested for, or convicted of a criminal offense.; or
d. With the intent to conceal the identity of the individual while congregating in a public
place with other individuals wearing a mask, hood, or other device that covers, hides, or
conceals any portion of the individual's face.
2. Subdivision d of subsection 1 does not apply to public gatherings to celebrate Halloween, a
masquerade, or other similar celebration.
3. A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

H. B. NO. 1226 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1226.
House Vote: Yeas 57 Nays 32 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 4 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State